Louisiana, session 2026, SB519.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1017.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1017.1. Health improvement programs for minors; deductible credit
A. The legislature finds that increased physical activity among minors
improves long-term health outcomes, reduces the incidence of chronic disease,
and lowers overall healthcare expenditures. The purpose of this Section is to
incentivize participation in physical activity by allowing certain expenses to be
credited toward a health insurance plan deductible providing coverage to
minors, including inclusive recreational opportunities for youth with
developmental disabilities.
B.(1) The provisions of this Section shall apply to health insurance
policies, plans, and contracts issued in this state that provide coverage for
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1509 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 519
dependents.
(2) The provisions of this Section shall not apply to any of the following:
(a) Medicare supplement policies.
(b) Medicaid managed care plans, unless otherwise required by federal
or state law.
(c) Self-funded plans governed by the federal Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA).
C.(1) Any health insurance policy subject to this Section shall allow the
insured to apply eligible expenses incurred on behalf of a covered dependent
toward the applicable annual deductible.
(2) The total amount of eligible expenses that may be credited toward the
deductible shall not exceed two hundred dollars per covered dependent per plan
year.
(3) Amounts credited under this Section:
(a) Shall count toward satisfaction of the deductible.
(b) Shall not be reimbursed separately as a medical expense.
(c) Shall not be applied toward out-of-pocket maximums unless
otherwise provided by the insurer.
D. As used in this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Covered dependent" means a minor enrolled under a health
insurance policy who is sixteen years of age or younger.
(2) "Developmental disability" shall have the same meaning as provided
in R.S. 28:451.2.
(3) "Eligible expense" means a documented payment for physical activity
dues and registration fees as defined in this Section and as verified in
accordance with Subsection E of this Section.
(4) "Physical activity dues and registration fees" means dues or fees paid
for structured programs or memberships that primarily promote physical
activity, including but not limited to any of the following:
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1509 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 519
(a) Youth sports registration fees, including participation in school-
affiliated, recreational, or competitive athletic programs.
(b) Youth summer camps in which a majority of programming involves
physical activity.
(c) Membership dues for gyms, fitness centers, or similar facilities that
provide access to physical exercise.
(d) Youth recreational programs designed for individuals with
developmental disabilities, including adaptive sports, therapeutic recreation
programs, and structured activity programs that promote physical engagement
and motor skill development.
E.(1) Insurers may require reasonable documentation to verify eligible
expenses, including but not limited to:
(a) Receipts.
(b) Registration confirmations.
(c) Proof of participation or membership.
(2) For any program provided for in Subparagraph (D)(1)(d) of this
Section, insurers may require documentation demonstrating that the program
is designed to serve individuals with developmental disabilities.
(3) Insurers shall create a clear and accessible process for submission
and approval of such expenses.
(4) Insurers shall not impose unreasonable administrative barriers to
participation in the program.
F. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations in
accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act to implement the provisions
of this Section.
G. All health insurance issuers subject to this Section shall provide notice
of the availability of this coverage to its insureds.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any new policy, contract,
program, or health coverage plan issued on or after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract,
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1509 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 519
or health coverage plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the
provisions of this Act on or before the renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2028.